Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202576-3806
Optional form for amendment by owner.

The following form may be used by an owner to make an amendment under section 76-3803:

Amendment by Owner to Remove an Unlawful Restriction

This amendment is recorded under the Uniform Unlawful Restrictions in Land Records Act (the act), by an owner of an interest in real property subject to an unlawful restriction as defined under the act.

(1) Name of owner: ..............................

(2) Owner's property that is subject to the unlawful restriction is described as follows:

Address: ..............................

Legal Description: ..............................

(3) This amendment amends the following document:

Title of document being amended: ..............................

Recording date of document being amended: .....................

Recording information (book/page or instrument number): ............

This amendment removes from the document described in paragraph (3) all unlawful restrictions as defined under the act. Removal of an unlawful restriction through this amendment does not affect the validity and enforceability of any other restriction that is not an unlawful restriction as defined under the act, at the time of filing this amendment. This amendment is not effective if the property is subject to a governing instrument as defined under the act.

........................................Owner's SignatureDate

This document was acknowledged before me this ............. day of ........., 20...., by .............................. (name of person acknowledged).

..............................(Seal)Notary Public

Laws 2025, LB21, § 6.